North Carolina, session 2025, HB277.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-84.2(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Opening and Closing Dates. – Local boards of education shall determine the dates of
opening and closing the public schools under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. Except for
year-round schools, the opening date for students shall be no earlier than the Monday closest to
August 26, August 10, and the closing date for students shall be no later than the Friday closest
to June 11. On a showing of good cause, the State Board of Education may waive the requirement
that the opening date for students be no earlier than the Monday closest to August 26 and may
allow the local board of education to set an opening date no earlier than the Monday closest to
August 19, to the extent that school calendars are able to provide sufficient days to accommodate
anticipated makeup days due to school closings. A local board may revise the scheduled closing
date if necessary in order to comply with the minimum requirements for instructional days or
instructional time. For purposes of this subsection, the term "good cause" means that schools in
any local school administrative unit in a county have been closed eight days per year during any
four of the last 10 years because of severe weather conditions, energy shortages, power failures,
or other emergency situations.
The required opening and closing dates under this subsection shall not apply to any school
that a local board designated as having a modified calendar for the 2003-2004 school year or to
any school that was part of a planned program in the 2003-2004 school year for a system of
modified calendar schools, so long as the school operates under a modified calendar."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-174.12(a)(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) All annual assessments of student achievement adopted by the State Board of
Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-174.11(c)(1) and (3) and all final exams for
courses shall be administered within the final 10 instructional days of the
school year for year-long courses and within the final five instructional days
of the semester for semester courses. Exceptions shall be permitted to
accommodate a student's individualized education program and section 504
(29 U.S.C. § 794) plans and for the administration of final exams for courses
with national or international curricula required to be held at designated times.
A local board of education that has implemented a school calendar that
concludes the fall semester prior to December 31 may administer assessments
prior to the conclusion of that semester."
*H277-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act applies only to Johnston County Schools.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 277-First Edition